Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1172.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 41A.12, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Account. new text end new text begin An agricultural growth, research, and innovation program account is created in the agricultural fund in the state treasury. The account consists of money received in the form of gifts, grants, reimbursements, or appropriations from any source for any of the purposes in subdivision 2, and any interest or earnings of the account. Money in the account is appropriated to the commissioner of agriculture for the purposes under subdivision 2. new text end